Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 41.1 Adjudication of Traffic Offenses

31-41.1-1.
Form of summons.

The summons and complaint to be issued to an offending operator shall contain any information, and be in any form that may be required by the rules of procedure promulgated by the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal. Every summons shall provide notice of:

The charge or charges against the operator; and

A date to appear in the traffic tribunal and answer the charges against him or her.

The form for the summons and complaint authorized by this section shall be used for all violations specified in §§

8-8.2-2

,

8-18-3

and

8-18-9

. The summons may be the same as the summons provided for in §

31-27-12

. The chief executive officer of each local police force which is required to use the summons and complaint provided for in this chapter shall prepare or cause to be prepared any records and reports that may be prescribed by the rules of the traffic tribunal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 1, § 12; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 30.

31-41.1-2.
Payment without personal appearance.

Any member of the state police, or any member of the police department of any city or town and any other duly authorized law enforcement officer who charges any person with an offense as set out in §

31-41.1-4

shall, in addition to issuing a summons for the offense, provide the offending operator with a form which will allow the offender to dispose of the charge without the necessity of personally appearing before the traffic tribunal. This section shall apply to resident and nonresident operators.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 3, § 1.

31-41.1-3.
Method of payment.

If the offending operator elects to dispose of the charge without personally appearing before the traffic tribunal, he or she shall execute the form indicated and return it to the traffic tribunal not later than twenty (20) days from the date of the summons, either by mailing or delivering the form and summons, to the violation section of the traffic tribunal, or to its designee, together with a check or money order in the amount indicated by the fine schedule on the form in addition to any technology surcharge applied by the traffic tribunal assessed in accordance with §

8-15-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 9; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 9.

31-41.1-3.1.
Mandatory court appearances.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

31-41.1-2

or

31-41.1-3

, any person who receives a third (3rd) summons after two (2) guilty adjudications for traffic offenses within twelve-month (12) period of time cannot plea or dispose of the charge by mail, but must appear in person before a judge at the traffic tribunal or municipal court. All parking ticket summons or adjudications shall be exempt from this section.

The preceding twelve-month (12) period shall be calculated from the date of the issuance of the third (3rd) summons, after the preceding two (2) adjudications.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 355, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 373, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 290, § 1.

31-41.1-4.
Schedule of violations.

The penalties for violations of the enumerated sections, listed in numerical order, correspond to the fines described. However, those offenses for which punishments may vary according to the severity of the offense, or punishment that requires the violator to perform a service, shall be heard and decided by the traffic tribunal or municipal court. The following violations may be handled administratively through the method prescribed in this chapter. This list is not exclusive and jurisdiction may be conferred on the traffic tribunal with regard to other violations.

In addition to any other penalties provided by law, a judge may impose the following penalties for speeding:

For speeds up to and including ten miles per hour (10 m.p.h.) over the posted speed limit on public highways, a fine as provided for in subsection (a) of this section for the first offense; ten dollars ($10.00) per mile for each mile in excess of the speed limit for the second offense if within twelve (12) months of the first offense; and fifteen dollars ($15.00) per mile for each mile in excess of the speed limit for the third and any subsequent offense if within twelve (12) months of the first offense. In addition, the license may be suspended up to thirty (30) days.

For speeds in excess of ten miles per hour (10 m.p.h.) over the posted speed limit on public highways, a mandatory fine of ten dollars ($10.00) for each mile over the speed limit for the first offense; fifteen dollars ($15.00) per mile for each mile in excess of the speed limit for the second offense if within twelve (12) months of the first offense; and twenty dollars ($20.00) per mile for each mile in excess of the speed limit for the third and subsequent offense if within twelve (12) months of the first offense. In addition, the license may be suspended up to sixty (60) days.

Except for a technology surcharge assessed in accordance with §

8-15-11

, any person charged with a violation who pays the fine administratively pursuant to this chapter shall not be subject to any additional costs or assessments, including, but not limited to, the hearing fee established in §

8-18-4

.

VIOLATIONS SCHEDULE Section of General Laws Total Fine

8-8.2-2

DOT, DEM, or other agency and department violations $85.00

24-10-17

Soliciting rides in motor vehicles 85.00

24-10-18

Backing up prohibited 85.00

24-10-19

Advertising motor vehicle for sale on state highways 100.00

24-10-20

Park and ride lots 85.00

24-12-37

Nonpayment of toll 100.00

31-3-12

Visibility of plates 85.00

31-3-18

Display of plates 85.00

31-3-32

Driving with expired registration 85.00

31-3-34

Failure to notify division of change of address 85.00

31-3-35

Notice of change of name 85.00

31-3-40

Temporary plates — dealer issued 85.00

31-4-3

Temporary registration — twenty-day (20) bill of sale 85.00

31-10-10

Rules as to armed forces license 85.00

31-10-30

Driving on expired license 85.00

31-10-32

Notice of change of address 85.00

31-10.1-4

No motorcycle helmet (operator) 85.00

31-10.1-5

Motorcycle handlebar violation 85.00

31-10.1-6

No motorcycle helmet (passenger) 85.00

31-10.1-7

Inspection of motorcycle required 85.00

31-12-12

Local motor vehicle ordinance 85.00

31-13-4

Obedience to devices 85.00

31-13-6(3)(i)

Eluding traffic light 85.00

31-13-9

Flashing signals 85.00

31-13-11

Injury to signs or devices 85.00

31-14-1

Reasonable and prudent speed 95.00

31-14-3

Condition requiring reduced speed 95.00

31-14-9

Below minimum speed 95.00

31-14-12

Speed limit on bridges and structures 95.00

31-15-1

Leaving lane of travel 85.00

31-15-2

Slow traffic to right 85.00

31-15-3

Operator left of center 85.00

31-15-4

Overtaking on left 85.00

31-15-5(a)

Overtaking on right 85.00

31-15-6

Clearance for overtaking 85.00

31-15-7

Places where overtaking prohibited 85.00

31-15-8

No passing zone 85.00

31-15-9

One way highways 85.00

31-15-1

0 Rotary traffic islands 85.00

31-15-11

Laned roadway violation 85.00

31-15-12

Following too closely 85.00

31-15-12.1

Entering intersection 100.00

31-15-13

Crossing center section of divided highway 85.00

31-15-14

Entering or leaving limited access roadways 85.00

31-15-16

Use of emergency break-down lane for travel 85.00

31-15-17

Crossing bicycle lane 85.00

31-15-18

Unsafe passing of person operating a bicycle 85.00

31-16-1

Care in starting from stop 85.00

31-16-2

Manner of turning at intersection 85.00

31-16-4

U turn where prohibited 85.00

31-16-5

Turn signal required 85.00

31-16-6

Time of signaling turn 85.00

31-16-7

Failure to give stop signal 85.00

31-16-8

Method of giving signals 85.00

31-16.1-3

Diesel vehicle idling rules first offense not to exceed 100.00 second and subsequent offense not to exceed 500.00

31-17-1

Failure to yield right of way 85.00

31-17-2

Vehicle turning left 85.00

31-17-3

Yield right of way (intersection) 85.00

31-17-4

Obedience to stop signs 85.00

31-17-5

Entering from private road or driveway 85.00

31-17-8

Vehicle within right of way, rotary 85.00

31-17-9

Yielding to bicycles on bicycle lane 85.00

31-18-3

Right of way in crosswalks first violation 85.00 second violation or any subsequent violation $100.00

31-18-5

Crossing other than at crosswalks 85.00

31-18-8

Due care by drivers 85.00

31-18-12

Hitchhiking 85.00

31-18-18

Right of way on sidewalks 85.00

31-19-3

Traffic laws applied to bicycles 85.00

31-19-20

Sale of new bicycles 85.00

31-19-21

Sale of used bicycles 85.00

31-19.1-2

Operating motorized bicycle on an interstate highway 85.00

31-19.2-2

Operating motorized tricycle on an interstate highway 85.00

31-20-1

Failure to stop at railroad crossing 85.00

31-20-2

Driving through railroad gate 85.00

31-20-9

Obedience to stop sign 85.00

31-21-4

Places where parking or stopping prohibited 85.00

31-21-14

Opening of vehicle doors 85.00

31-21-18

Electric vehicle charging station restriction 85.00

31-22-2

Improper backing up 85.00

31-22-4

Overloading vehicle 85.00

31-22-5

Violation of safety zone 85.00

31-22-6

Coasting 85.00

31-22-7

Following fire apparatus 85.00

31-22-8

Crossing fire hose 85.00

31-22-9

Throwing debris on highway — snow removal 85.00

31-22-11.5

Improper use of school bus — not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each day of improper use

31-22-22(a)

No child restraint 85.00

31-22-22(a)

Child restraint/seat belt but not in any rear seating position 85.00 , (f)

31-22-22(b)

No seat belt — passenger 40.00

31-22-22(g)

No seat belt — operator 40.00

31-22-23

Tow trucks — proper identification 275.00

31-22-24

Operation of interior lights 85.00

31-23-1(b)(2)

U.S. department of transportation motor carrier safety rules and regulations Not less than $85.00 or more than $500.00

31-23-1(e)(6)

Removal of an “out of service vehicle” sticker 125.00

31-23-1(e)(7)

Operation of an “out of service vehicle” 100.00

31-23-2(b)

Installation or adjustment of unsafe or prohibited parts, equipment, or accessories: (first offense) 250.00 (second offense) 500.00 (third and subsequent offenses) 1,000.00

31-23-4

Brake equipment required 85.00

31-23-8

Horn required 85.00

31-23-10

Sirens prohibited 85.00

31-23-13

Muffler required 85.00

31-23-13.1

Altering height or operating a motor vehicle with an altered height 85.00

31-23-14

Prevention of excessive fumes or smoke 85.00

31-23-16

Windshield and window stickers (visibility) 85.00

31-23-17

Windshield wipers 85.00

31-23-19

Metal tires prohibited 85.00

31-23-20

Protuberances on tires 85.00

31-23-26

Fenders and wheel flaps required 85.00

31-23-27

Rear wheel flaps on buses, trucks, and trailers 85.00

31-23-29

Flares or red flag required over four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.) 85.00

31-23-40

Approved types of seat belt requirements 85.00

31-23-4

2.1 Special mirror — school bus 85.00

31-23-43

Chocks required (1 pair) — over four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.) 85.00

31-23-45

Tire treads — defective tires 85.00

31-23-47

Slow moving emblem required 85.00

31-23-49

Transportation of gasoline — passenger vehicle 85.00

31-23-51

Operating bike or motor vehicle wearing ear phones (first offense) 85.00 second offense 95.00 for the third and each subsequent offense 140.00 through

31-24-1

31-24-54

Times when lights required 85.00

31-25-9

Leaking load 85.00

31-25-11

Connections between coupled vehicles 85.00

31-25-12

Towing chain, twelve-inch (12") square flag required 85.00

31-25-12

.1 Tow truck — use of lanes (first offense) 85.00 second offense 95.00 for the third and each subsequent offense 100.00

31-25-17

Identification of trucks and truck-tractors (first offense) 85.00 (second offense) 95.00 for the third and subsequent offenses 125.00

31-25-24

Carrying and inspection of excess load limit 350.00

31-27-2.3

Refusal to take preliminary breath test 85.00

31-28-7(d)

Wrongful use of handicapped parking placard 500.00

31-28-7(f)

Handicapped parking space violation: First offense 100.00 Second offense 175.00 Third offense and subsequent offenses 325.00

31-28-7.1(e)

Wrongful use of institutional handicapped parking placard 125.00

31-33-2

Failure to file accident report 85.00

31-34-2

Proof of insurance — motor vehicle rental 85.00

31-34-3

Operation by person other than lessee 85.00

31-36.1-17

No fuel tax stamp (out-of-state) 85.00 and not exceeding ($100) for subsequent offense

31-38-3

No inspection sticker 85.00

31-38-4

Violation of inspection laws 85.00

31-41.3-15

Automated school zone speed enforcement system 50.00

31-47.2-6

Heavy-duty vehicle emission inspections: First offense 125.00 Second offense 525.00 Third and subsequent offenses 1,025.00

37-15-7

Littering not less than 55.00, not more than five hundred dollars ($500)

39-12-26

Public carriers violation 300.00

Click to view

SPEEDING Fine (A) One to ten miles per hour (1-10 m.p.h.) in excess of posted speed limit $ 95.00 (B) Eleven miles per hour (11 m.p.h.) in excess of posted speed limit with a fine of ten dollars ($10.00) per mile in excess of speed limit shall be assessed. 205.00 minimum

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 70; P.L. 2000, ch. 223, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 280, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 318, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 87; P.L. 2001, ch. 132, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 26; P.L. 2002, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 57; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 64, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 67, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 25, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 557, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 414, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 485, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 19, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 249, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 311, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 310, § 11; P.L. 2010, ch. 92, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 132, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 141, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 142, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 9; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 9; P.L. 2017, ch. 204, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 49, § 2, effective June 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 50, § 2, effective June 11, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 96, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 97, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 178, § 2, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 179, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

31-41.1-5.
Failure to answer or appear.

In the event the person charged with a violation does not pay the fine administratively in accordance with the provisions of §

31-41.1-3

, then he or she shall have waived his or her right to dispose of the offense without personal appearance, and the person charged with the violation must then appear before the traffic tribunal or municipal court on the date specified on the summons. If the person charged with the violation shall fail to appear on the specified date, a judge or magistrate may enter default judgment, and after hearing any evidence presented, determine whether the charges have been established. If the charges are not established, an order dismissing the charges shall be entered. If a determination is made that a charge has been established, an appropriate order shall be entered in the records of the traffic tribunal, including any order of suspension of the license or driving privilege of the person so charged in the same manner as set forth in §

31-41.1-6

.

The order shall be mailed to the person charged with the violation at his or her last known address.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 3, § 1.

31-41.1-6.
Hearings.

Every hearing for the adjudication of a traffic violation, as provided by this chapter, shall be held before a judge or magistrate of the traffic tribunal or a judge of the municipal court, where provided by law. The burden of proof shall be upon the state, city, or town and no charge may be established except by clear and convincing evidence. A verbatim recording shall be made of all proceedings. The chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal may prescribe, by rule or regulation, the procedures for the conduct of the hearings and for pre-hearing discovery.

After due consideration of the evidence and arguments, the judge or magistrate shall determine whether the charges have been established, and appropriate findings of fact shall be made on the record. If the charges are not established, an order dismissing the charges shall be entered. If a determination is made that a charge has been established or if an answer admitting the charge has been received, an appropriate order shall be entered in the records of the traffic tribunal.

An order entered after the receipt of an answer admitting the charge or where a determination is made that the charge has been established shall be civil in nature, and shall be treated as an adjudication that a violation has been committed. A judge or magistrate may include in the order the imposition of any penalty authorized by any provisions of this title for the violation, including, but not limited to, license suspension, and/or in the case of a motorist under the age of twenty (20), community service, except that no penalty for it shall include imprisonment. A judge or magistrate may order the suspension or revocation of a license or of a registration in the name of the defendant in accordance with any provisions of this title that authorize the suspension or revocation of a license or of a registration, or may order the suspension of the license and the registration of the defendant for the willful failure to pay a fine previously imposed. In addition, after notice and opportunity to be heard, a judge or magistrate may order the suspension of the registration of the vehicle with which the violation was committed, if the defendant has willfully failed to pay a fine previously imposed.

A judge or magistrate may, as authorized by law, order a motorist to attend a rehabilitative driving course operated under the jurisdiction of a college or university accredited by the state of Rhode Island, or the trained personnel of the department of revenue. An order to attend a course may also include a provision to pay reasonable tuition for the course in an amount not to exceed the fee established by the college or university accredited by the state of Rhode Island or the department of revenue for driver retraining. The order shall contain findings of fact. Failure to comply with an order of attendance may, after notice and hearing, result in the suspension or revocation of a person’s license or registration.

Unless a judge or magistrate determines that a substantial traffic safety hazard would result from it, he or she may delay for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days the effective date of any suspension or revocation of a driver’s license or vehicle registration imposed pursuant to this chapter. However, the regulations may provide for the immediate surrender of any item to be suspended or revoked and the issuance of appropriate temporary documentation to be used during the thirty-day (30) period. Any order for immediate surrender of a driver’s license or vehicle registration shall contain a statement of reasons for it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 25, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 1, § 12; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 27; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 27; P.L. 2009, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 262, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 264, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.

31-41.1-7.
Application for dismissal based on good driving record.

Any person who has had a motor vehicle operator’s license for more than three (3) years, and who has been issued traffic violations which are his or her first violations within the preceding three (3) years, may request a hearing seeking a dismissal of the violations based upon the operator’s good driving record.

Upon submission of proper proof that the operator has not been issued any other traffic violation within the past three (3) years, the charge shall, except for good cause shown or as otherwise provided by law, be dismissed based upon a good driving record; provided, that the operator pay a thirty-five dollar ($35.00) administrative fee for court costs associated with the dismissal. Additionally, beginning July 1, 2014, there shall be imposed a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) surcharge on all dismissals based upon a good driving record to be deposited into the Rhode Island highway maintenance account.

The traffic tribunal may not dismiss a charge pursuant to this section after six (6) months from the date of disposition. For purposes of this section, a parking ticket shall not constitute a prior violation.

The following violations shall not be dismissed pursuant to this statute:

Any violation within the original jurisdiction of superior or district court;

A refusal to submit to a chemical test of breath, blood or urine pursuant to §

31-27-2.1

;

Any violation involving a school bus;

Any violation involving an accident where there has been property damage or personal injury;

Any speeding violation in excess of fourteen miles per hour (14 m.p.h.) above the posted speed limit;

Any violation involving child restraints in motor vehicles pursuant to §

31-22-22

;

Any violation committed by a holder of a commercial license as defined in §

31-10.3-3

or any violation committed in a commercial motor vehicle as defined in §

31-10.3-3

by an operator who does not hold a commercial license.

If the charge is dismissed pursuant to this section, records of the dismissal shall be maintained for a period of three (3) years.

The judge or magistrate shall have the discretion to waive court costs and fees when dismissing a violation pursuant to this section, with the exception of the mandatory thirty-five dollars ($35.00) administrative fee and the twenty-five dollar ($25.00) surcharge provided for in subsection (b) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 10; P.L. 2003, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 77, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 82, § 8; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 35, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 21, § 5.

31-41.1-8.
Appellate review.

Appeals panels. The chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal shall establish one or more appeals panels, each consisting of three (3) members of the traffic tribunal, and shall select a presiding member for each appeals panel from the members so appointed. No member of the traffic tribunal shall serve as a member of an appeals panel hearing the appeal of a determination by that member. The chief judge shall also designate any other personnel of the traffic tribunal that may be necessary to assist an appeals panel in carrying out its functions.

Right of appeal. Any person who is aggrieved by a determination of a judge or magistrate may appeal the determination pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Appeals panel. Each appeal filed pursuant to this section shall be reviewed by an appeals panel, which shall make a determination of the appeal, and shall cause an appropriate order to be entered in the records of the traffic tribunal.

Time limitations. No appeal shall be reviewed if it is filed more than ten (10) days after notice was given of the determination from which it was appealed, unless it is determined that failure to file was due to excusable neglect. Notice shall be complete upon mailing.

Appeal procedures. Any person desiring to file an appeal from an adverse determination pursuant to this section shall do so in a form and manner provided by the clerk of the traffic tribunal. The transcript of any hearing that formed the basis for the determination will be reviewed only if it is submitted by the appellant. An appeal shall not be deemed to be finally submitted until the appellant has submitted all forms or documents required to be submitted by the clerk of the traffic tribunal or by this section.

Standard of review. The appeals panel shall not substitute its judgment for that of the judge or magistrate as to the weight of the evidence on questions of fact. The appeals panel may affirm the decision of the judge or magistrate, or it may remand the case for further proceedings or reverse or modify the decision if the substantial rights of the appellant have been prejudiced because the judge’s findings, inferences, conclusions or decisions are:

In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;

In excess of the statutory authority of the judge or magistrate;

Made upon unlawful procedure;

Affected by other error of law;

Clearly erroneous in view of the reliable, probative, and substantial evidence on the whole record; or

Arbitrary or capricious or characterized by abuse of discretion or clearly unwarranted exercise of discretion.

Transcript of hearings. Transcripts of the record of any hearing may be obtained at the cost of the traffic tribunal, if prepared by the tribunal, or at a rate specified in the contract between the court and the contractor, if prepared by a private contractor.

Fees. The fee for filing an appeal shall be twenty-five dollars ($25.00), and this fee shall be deposited into the general fund. In addition to the appeal filing fee, the traffic tribunal shall apply a technology surcharge assessed in accordance with §

8-15-11

. No appeal shall be accepted unless the required fee has been paid or if forma pauperis status has been granted.

Stays pending appeal. Whenever a determination has not been made within thirty (30) days after an appeal has been finally submitted, a stay of execution will be deemed granted by operation of law, and the license, certificate, permit, or privilege affected will be automatically restored pending final determination by the appeals panel.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 1, § 12; P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 9; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 9.

31-41.1-9.
Appeals to district court.

Right of appeal. Any person who is aggrieved by a determination of an appeals panel may appeal the determination pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Time limitations. No appeal shall be reviewed if it is filed more than ten (10) days after notice was given of the determination from which it was appealed. Notice shall be complete upon mailing.

Appeal procedures. Any person desiring to file an appeal from an adverse determination pursuant to this section shall do so in a form and manner provided by the clerk of the traffic tribunal. The transcript of any hearing that formed the basis for the determination will be reviewed only if it is submitted by the appellant. An appeal shall not be deemed to be finally submitted until the appellant has submitted all forms or documents required to be submitted by the clerk of the traffic tribunal or by this section.

Standard of review. The judge of the district court shall not substitute his or her judgment for that of the appeals panel as to the weight of the evidence on questions of fact. The district court judge may affirm the decision of the appeals panel, or may remand the case for further proceedings or reverse or modify the decision if the substantial rights of the appellant have been prejudiced because the appeals panel’s findings, inferences, conclusions or decisions are:

In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;

In excess of the statutory authority of the appeals panel;

Made upon unlawful procedure;

Affected by other error of law;

Clearly erroneous in view of the reliable, probative, and substantial evidence on the whole record; or

Arbitrary or capricious or characterized by abuse of discretion or clearly unwarranted exercise of discretion.

Transcript of hearings. Transcripts of the record of any hearing may be obtained at the cost of the traffic tribunal, if prepared by the tribunal, or at a rate specified in the contract between the tribunal and the contractor, if prepared by a private contractor.

Fees. The fee for filing an appeal shall be twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and this fee shall be deposited into the general fund. In addition to the appeal filing fee, the traffic tribunal shall apply a technology surcharge assessed in accordance with §

8-15-11

. No appeal shall be accepted unless the required fee has been paid or if forma pauperis status has been granted.

Stays pending appeal. Whenever a determination has not been made within thirty (30) days after an appeal has been finally submitted, a stay of execution will be deemed granted by operation of law, and the license, certificate, permit, or privilege affected will be automatically restored pending final determination by the district court.

Certiorari. Any person who has exhausted all remedies available to him or her under the provisions of this section, including an appeal before the district court, may seek review by petition for writ of certiorari to the supreme court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 9; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 9.

31-41.1-10.
Expungement.

All violations within this title which are in the jurisdiction of the traffic tribunal or of a municipal court shall by operation of law, after three (3) years, following adjudication of the violation and after expiration of any mandatory state or federal record-retention period, be expunged from the records of the traffic tribunal or the municipal court and from the records of the division of motor vehicles, except for those offenses related to alcohol as provided in §

31-27-2.1

, which shall be expunged after five (5) years. These expungements shall be in addition to and not in place of any expungement provided for by chapter 1.3 of title 12.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 112, § 1.

31-41.1-11.
Jurisdiction.

The traffic tribunal shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over the adjudication of charges under § 31-27-2.1(c)(1) (Refusal to submit to chemical test first violation).

The district court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over the adjudication of charges under §

31-27-2.1(c)(2)

and (3) (Refusal to submit to chemical test, second violation and third and subsequent violations).

Nothing in subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be deemed to abrogate the jurisdiction of any municipal court under the provisions of chapter 18 of title 8 of the general laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 46, § 1.